Georgia, session 2025_26, HB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
10 PART I
11 SECTION 1-1.
12 Chapter 3 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to accountants, is
13 amended by revising Code Section 43-3-1, relating to short title, as follows:
H. B. 148
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
14 "43-3-1.
15 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 'Public Accountancy Act of 2014
16 2025.'"
17 SECTION 1-2.
18 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-9, relating to requirements for
19 certificate of certified public accountant and disclosure of commissions from sale of
20 insurance or financial products, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
21 "(b) The certificate of certified public accountant shall be granted by the board to any
22 individual:
23 (1) Who has attained the age of 18;
24 (2) Who is, in the opinion of the board, of good moral character;
25 (3) Who meets the following requirements of education and experience described in any
26 one of the following subparagraphs:
27 (A)(i) Presentation to the board of such evidence as it may require that the applicant
28 has received a baccalaureate degree or completed the requirements therefor, conferred
29 by a college or university accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization
30 recognized by the board, by successfully completing at such college or university a
31 program of study that consists of not fewer than 150 semester hours, or equivalent
32 quarter credit hours, with a concentration in accounting or what the board determines
33 to be the substantial equivalent of comparable to an accounting concentration, or with
34 a nonaccounting concentration supplemented by what the board determines to be the
35 substantial equivalent of comparable to an accounting concentration, including related
36 courses in other areas of business administration.
37 (ii) After January 1, 1998, any individual who has not previously sat for the uniform
38 written examination for the certificate of certified public accountant must have
39 completed a total of 150 semester hours or 225 quarter hours of college education,
H. B. 148
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
40 including a baccalaureate degree awarded by a college or university accredited by
41 either a national or regional accrediting organization recognized by the board. The
42 total educational program shall include an undergraduate accounting concentration
43 as defined by the board or what the board determines to be the substantial equivalent
44 of an undergraduate accounting concentration; and
45 (B)(ii) One year of continuous experience in the accounting field relevant to the
46 practice of public accountancy immediately preceding the date of application for the
47 certificate or within a reasonable time prior to the date of such application as provided
48 by the board by rule or regulation; provided, however, that the board may promulgate
49 rules or regulations stating certain circumstances which shall constitute acceptable
50 breaks in the continuity of such experience; provided, further, that the board may
51 accept, in lieu of such year of experience in public accounting, evidence satisfactory
52 to it of one year of continuous employment in the accounting field in industry,
53 business, government, or college teaching; any combination of employment in such
54 fields; or any combination of employment in such fields and the practice of public
55 accountancy immediately preceding the date of application for the certificate or what
56 the board determines to be the equivalent thereof; and provided, further, that any
57 individual certificated as a certified public accountant under the laws of this state on
58 July 1, 1977, shall be deemed to have the experience in the practice of public
59 accountancy required by this subparagraph; and
60 (B)(i) Presentation to the board of such evidence as it may require that the applicant
61 has received a master's degree or completed the requirements therefor, conferred by
62 a college or university accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization
63 recognized by the board, with a concentration in accounting or taxation or what the
64 board determines to be comparable to an accounting or taxation concentration, or with
65 a nonaccounting concentration supplemented by what the board determines to be
H. B. 148
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
66 comparable to an accounting or taxation concentration, including related courses in
67 other areas of business administration; and
68 (ii) One year of continuous experience in the accounting field relevant to the practice
69 of public accountancy immediately preceding the date of application for the certificate
70 or within a reasonable time prior to the date of such application as provided by the
71 board by rule or regulation; provided, however, that the board may promulgate rules
72 or regulations stating certain circumstances which shall constitute acceptable breaks
73 in the continuity of such experience; provided, further, that the board may accept, in
74 lieu of such year of experience in public accounting, evidence satisfactory to it of one
75 year of continuous employment in the accounting field in industry, business,
76 government, or college teaching; any combination of employment in such fields; or
77 any combination of employment in such fields and the practice of public accountancy
78 immediately preceding the date of application for the certificate or what the board
79 determines to be the equivalent thereof; or
80 (C)(i) Presentation to the board of such evidence as it may require that the applicant
81 has received a baccalaureate degree or completed the requirements therefor, conferred
82 by a college or university accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization
83 recognized by the board, with a concentration in accounting or what the board
84 determines to be comparable to an accounting concentration, or with a nonaccounting
85 concentration supplemented by what the board determines to be comparable to an
86 accounting concentration, including related courses in other areas of business
87 administration; and
88 (ii) Two years of continuous experience in the accounting field relevant to the
89 practice of public accountancy immediately preceding the date of application for the
90 certificate or within a reasonable time prior to the date of such application as provided
91 by the board by rule or regulation; provided, however, that the board may promulgate
92 rules or regulations stating certain circumstances which shall constitute acceptable
H. B. 148
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
93 breaks in the continuity of such experience; provided, further, that the board may
94 accept, in lieu of such two years of experience in public accounting, evidence
95 satisfactory to it of two years of continuous employment in the accounting field in
96 industry, business, government, or college teaching; any combination of employment
97 in such fields; or any combination of employment in such fields and the practice of
98 public accountancy immediately preceding the date of application for the certificate
99 or what the board determines to be the equivalent thereof; and
100 (4) Who shall have passed an examination approved by the board in such related subjects
101 as the board deems appropriate."
102 SECTION 1-3.
103 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-10, relating to examinations for
104 certified public accountants, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
105 "(b) As Unless otherwise provided by rule or regulation of the board, as a prerequisite to
106 sit for the examination, applicants shall meet the education requirements provided in
107 division (b)(3)(A)(ii) (b)(3)(A)(i), (b)(3)(B)(i), or (b)(3)(C)(i) of Code Section 43-3-9."
108 SECTION 1-4.
109 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-3-12, relating to reciprocity for
110 certified public accountants, as follows:
111 "43-3-12.
112 The board, in its discretion, may waive the examination provided for in paragraph (4) of
113 subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-9 and may issue a certificate as a certified public
114 accountant to any individual who possesses the qualifications specified in paragraphs (1)
115 and (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-9 and what the board determines to be the
116 substantial equivalent of comparable to the qualifications under paragraph (3) of
117 subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-9 and who is a holder of a certificate as a certified
H. B. 148
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
118 public accountant, then in full force and effect, issued under the laws of any other state;
119 provided, however, that the certificate held by such individual was issued by any other state
120 after an examination which, in the judgment of the board, is the equivalent of the standard
121 established by the board for examinations administered pursuant to paragraph (4) of
122 subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-9; and provided, further, that such privileges are
123 extended to citizens of this state by any other state that originally granted the certificate.
124 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the examination provided for in paragraph (4) of
125 subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-9 shall may be waived by the board in the case of an
126 applicant who has been engaged in public practice for a period of ten years in any other
127 state pursuant to the authority of such state."
128 SECTION 1-5.
129 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-3-16, relating to licensure
130 requirements for firms practicing public accountancy, as follows:
131 "43-3-16.
132 (a) The board shall grant or renew the license of a firm practicing public accountancy to
133 firms that meet the following requirements:
134 (1)(A) Partners, members, or shareholders owning at least a simple majority of the
135 financial interest and voting rights of the firm shall be certified public accountants of
136 this state or any other state in good standing, except that such partners, members, or
137 shareholders who are certified public accountants and whose office location designated
138 by such partners, members, or shareholders who are certified public accountants for
139 purposes of substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges and reciprocity is in
140 this state and who perform accounting services in this state shall be required to hold a
141 license from this state.
142 (B) An individual who has substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges under
143 subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18 who performs services for which a firm
H. B. 148
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
144 licensure is required under paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18
145 shall not be required to obtain a certificate or license under this chapter;
146 (2) The firm shall be in compliance with all requirements and provisions of law
147 governing the organizational form of the firm in any other state that is the firm's office
148 location designation for purposes of substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges
149 and reciprocity;
150 (3) The firm shall comply with all rules or regulations pertaining to firms licensed by the
151 board;
152 (4) The resident manager, as such term is defined in the board's rules or regulations, of
153 each office of the firm within this state in the practice of public accountancy shall be a
154 certified public accountant of this state in good standing;
155 (5) Any firm that includes nonlicensee owners shall comply with the following rules:
156 (A) The firm shall designate the holder of a license in this state, or in the case of a firm
157 which is required to be licensed pursuant to subparagraph (b)(1)(C) of this Code
158 section, a licensee of any other state who meets the substantial equivalency mobility
159 practice privileges requirements set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18,
160 who shall be responsible for the proper licensure of the firm and shall identify that
161 individual to the board;
162 (B) All nonlicensee owners shall provide services or perform functions in the firm or
163 the firm's affiliated entities; and
164 (C) The firm shall comply with such other requirements as the board may impose by
165 rule or regulation;
166 (6) Any holder of a license in this state and any individual who qualifies for substantial
167 equivalency mobility practice privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18
168 who is responsible for supervising attest or compilation services and signs or authorizes
169 someone to sign the accountant's report on behalf of the firm shall meet the competency
170 requirements set by the board for such services; and
H. B. 148
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
171 (7) Any holder of a license in this state and any individual who qualifies for substantial
172 equivalency mobility practice privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18
173 who signs or authorizes someone to sign the accountant's report on behalf of the firm
174 shall meet the competency requirements set by the board.
175 (b)(1) The following firms shall be required to be licensed under this Code section:
176 (A) Any firm with a physical office in this state practicing public accountancy;
177 (B) Any firm with a physical office in this state that uses the title 'CPA' or 'CPA firm';
178 and
179 (C) Any firm that does not have a physical office in this state but performs any service
180 described in subparagraph (A), (C), or (D) of paragraph (2) or paragraph (4) of Code
181 Section 43-3-2 for a client that specifies a location in this state to which such service
182 is directed, unless such firm meets the requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection.
183 (2) A firm that does not have a physical office in this state may perform services
184 described in subparagraphs (B) and (E) of paragraph (2) or paragraph (4) of Code
185 Section 43-3-2 for a client that specifies a location in this state to which any service
186 described in subparagraph (A), (C), or (D) of paragraph (2) of Code Section 43-3-2 is
187 such services are directed and may use the title 'CPA' or 'CPA firm' without being
188 licensed as provided in this Code section only if:
189 (A) It meets the qualifications described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code
190 section;
191 (B) It complies with the board's rules or regulations regarding peer review; and
192 (C) It performs such services through an individual with substantial equivalency who
193 is licensed in this state under Code Section 43-3-9 or who has mobility practice
194 privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18.
195 (3) A firm that does not have a physical office in this state and that is not subject to the
196 requirements of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of this subsection
197 may perform other professional services, as such services are defined in the board's rules
H. B. 148
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
198 or regulations, included in the practice of public accountancy while using the title 'CPA'
199 or 'CPA firm' in this state without being licensed under this Code section only if:
200 (A) It performs such services through an individual with substantial equivalency
201 practice privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18; and
202 (B) It can lawfully perform such services in any other state where such individuals with
203 substantial equivalency practice privileges have their office location designated by such
204 individuals for purposes of substantial equivalency and reciprocity.
205 (c) Each firm required to be licensed under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code
206 section shall be licensed biennially under this chapter with the board, provided that any
207 firm for which such requirement becomes effective between biennial reporting periods
208 shall become licensed with the board within 60 days. Such a firm shall be required to show
209 that all attest and compilation services rendered in this state are under the supervision of
210 an individual holding a license issued by the board or an individual with substantial
211 equivalency mobility practice privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18.
212 The board, by rule or regulation, shall prescribe the procedure to be followed in effecting
213 such licensure and the information which shall be required to be provided regarding the
214 firm and its practice.
215 (d) A licensed firm shall file written notice to the board, within 60 days after the
216 occurrence of the opening of a new office or the closing or change of address of any of its
217 offices in this state. Each such office shall be under the supervision of a resident manager
218 who may be a partner, principal, shareholder, member, or a staff employee holding a
219 license in this state.
220 (e) Neither the denial of a firm license under this Code section nor the denial of the
221 renewal of a firm license under Code Section 43-3-17 shall be considered to be a contested
222 case within the meaning of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure
223 Act.' Notice and hearing within the meaning of Chapter 13 of Title 50 shall not be
H. B. 148
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
224 required, but the applicant shall be allowed to appear before the board if he or she
225 requests."
226 SECTION 1-6.
227 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-3-18, relating to issuance of
228 license to practice accountancy and substantial equivalency practice privilege for
229 nonresidents, as follows:
230 "43-3-18.
231 (a) A license to engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state shall be issued
232 by the executive director, at the direction of the board, to each individual who is
233 certificated as a certified public accountant under Code Section 43-3-9 or 43-3-12 or who
234 shall have furnished evidence, satisfactory to the board, of compliance with the continuing
235 professional education requirements of Code Section 43-3-19, and to firms licensed under
236 Code Section 43-3-16, provided that such firms are maintained and licensed as required
237 under Code Sections 43-3-16 and 43-3-17. There shall be a biennial license fee in an
238 amount to be determined by the board.
239 (b) Individuals may practice under substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges as
240 follows:
241 (1) An individual whose office location designation by such individual for purposes of
242 substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges and reciprocity is in any other state
243 shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's
244 requirements, shall have all the privileges of license holders of this state, and may
245 practice public accountancy in this state without the requirement to obtain a license under
246 this chapter or to otherwise notify the board or pay any license fee if the individual:
247 (A) Holds holds a current license in good standing as a certified public accountant from
248 any other state which requires, as a condition of licensure, that an individual and
H. B. 148
- 10 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
249 continues to be so licensed during the pendency of the individual's practice in this state,
250 and:
251 (i)(A) Has at least 150 semester hours of college education including a baccalaureate
252 or higher degree conferred by a college or university; attained such education and
253 experience as the board by rule or regulation may establish as necessary to practice
254 under mobility practice privileges; and
255 (ii)(B) Achieves Has achieved a passing grade on the Uniform Certified Public
256 Accountant Examination; and
257 (iii) Possesses at least one year of experience, including providing any type of service
258 or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory,
259 financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, which may be obtained through
260 government, industry, academic, or public practice all of which was verified by a
261 licensee; or
262 (B) Holds a current license as a certified public accountant from any other state which
263 does not meet the requirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph but such
264 individual's certified public accountant qualifications are substantially equivalent to
265 those requirements. Any individual who passed the Uniform Certified Public
266 Accountant Examination and holds a current license issued by any other state prior to
267 January 1, 2012, may be exempt from the education requirement in division (1)(A)(i)
268 of this subsection for purposes of this subparagraph;
269 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who offers or renders
270 professional services, as such services are defined in the board's rules or regulations,
271 whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic means, under this Code section
272 shall be granted substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges in this state and no
273 notice, license, fee, or other submission shall be provided by any such individual. Such
274 an individual shall be subject to the requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection;
H. B. 148
- 11 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
275 (3) An individual licensee of any other state exercising the privilege afforded under this
276 subsection, and any firm that employs such individual, shall simultaneously consent, as
277 a condition of exercising this privilege:
278 (A) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the
279 board;
280 (B) To comply with the provisions of this chapter and the board's rules or regulations;
281 (C) That in the event the individual's license issued by any other state designated by
282 such individual for purposes of substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges and
283 reciprocity is not current, the individual shall cease practicing public accountancy in
284 this state individually and on behalf of a firm; and
285 (D) To the appointment of the board that issued the individual's license as the
286 individual's agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by
287 this state's board against the individual;
288 (4) An individual who qualifies for the substantial equivalency mobility practice
289 privileges under this Code section who, for a client who specifies a location in this state
290 to which any service under subparagraph (A), (C), or (D) of paragraph (2) of Code
291 Section 43-3-2 is directed, may only perform such services through a firm that is licensed
292 with the board under meets the requirements of Code Section 43-3-16; and
293 (5) An individual qualifying for the substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges
294 under paragraph (1) of this subsection may provide expert witness services in this state
295 and shall be deemed to be in compliance with Code Section 24-7-702 for purposes of
296 such services.
297 (c) Subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be applied or construed to allow an
298 individual to engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state based on substantial
299 equivalency mobility practice privileges unless such individual holds a current license as
300 a certified public accountant in any other state which grants similar reciprocity to license
301 holders in this state."
H. B. 148
- 12 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
302 SECTION 1-7.
303 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-21, relating to revocation or refusal
304 to grant or renew license and immunity, by revising the introductory language of
305 subsection (a) as follows:
306 "(a) The board may refuse to grant a license to an applicant, revoke any license issued by
307 the board, discipline a licensee, or forbid an individual from exercising the substantial
308 equivalency mobility practice privileges for any one or any combination of the following
309 causes:"
310 SECTION 1-8.
311 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-23, relating to adjudicative hearings
312 before board, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
313 "(c) Before the board shall revoke or suspend a license, a certificate, or substantial
314 equivalency mobility practice privileges, it shall provide for a hearing for the holder of
315 such license, certificate, or practice privileges in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50,
316 the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.' Any person who has exhausted all
317 administrative remedies available within this chapter and who is aggrieved by a final
318 decision in a contested case shall be entitled to judicial review in accordance with
319 Chapter 13 of Title 50."
320 SECTION 1-9.
321 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-27, relating to notification of
322 conviction, time limit, and suspension, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
323 "(a) Any individual issued a license or certification under this chapter or providing services
324 under substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges and convicted under the laws of
325 this state, the United States, any other state, or any other country of a felony as defined in
326 paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 43-1-19 shall be required to notify the
H. B. 148
- 13 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
327 board of such conviction within 30 days of such conviction. The failure of such individual
328 to notify the board of a conviction shall be considered grounds for revocation of his or her
329 license or other authorization issued pursuant to this chapter."
330 SECTION 1-10.
331 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-3-28, relating to reinstatement
332 or modification of a revoked or suspended license, as follows:
333 "43-3-28.
334 Upon written application after a hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia
335 Administrative Procedure Act,' the board may recertificate a certified public accountant
336 whose certification has been revoked or may reissue or modify the suspension of a license
337 or substantial equivalency mobility practice privileges which have been revoked or
338 suspended."
339 SECTION 1-11.
340 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-30, relating to injunctions and
341 enforcement, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
342 "(c) The electronic, printed, engraved, or written display or uttering by a person of a card,
343 sign, advertisement, instrument, or other device bearing an individual's name in
344 conjunction with the words 'certified public accountant' or any abbreviation thereof shall
345 be prima-facie evidence in any action brought under this Code section or Code
346 Section 43-3-34 that the individual whose name is so displayed caused or procured the
347 electronic, printed, engraved, or written display or uttering of such card, sign,
348 advertisement, instrument, or other device and that such individual is holding himself or
349 herself out to be a certified public accountant holding a license or otherwise claims to be
350 qualified to use such title by virtue of the substantial equivalency mobility practice
351 privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18 or of the firm practice provisions
H. B. 148
- 14 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
352 of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-16. In any such action, evidence of the commission
353 of a single act prohibited by this chapter shall be sufficient to justify an injunction or a
354 conviction without evidence of a general course of conduct."
355 SECTION 1-12.
356 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-3-31, relating to prohibited use of title
357 or designation and false or deceptive practices, by revising subsection (h) as follows:
358 "(h) It shall not be a violation of this Code section or chapter for an individual who does
359 not hold a license under this chapter but who qualifies for the substantial equivalency
360 mobility practice privileges under subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18 to use the title
361 or designation 'certified public accountant' or 'CPA' or other titles to indicate that the
362 individual is a certified public accountant, and such individual may engage in the practice
363 of public accountancy in this state with the same privileges as a license holder so long as
364 the individual complies with paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-18."
365 PART II
366 SECTION 2-1.
367 Article 1 of Chapter 81 of Title 36 of Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to local
368 government budget and audits, is amended in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-81-8.1,
369 relating to definitions, grant certification forms, filing with state auditor, forfeiture of funds
370 for noncompliance, and no exemption from liability, by replacing "subparagraph (b)(3)(A)
371 of Code Section 43-3-9" with "paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-3-9".
H. B. 148
- 15 -

25 LC 55 0431/AP
372 PART III
373 SECTION 3-1.
374 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
375 SECTION 3-2.
376 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 148
- 16 -